lexicon/particle.lexc
! Частицы
LEXICON Particle
	ба	Tag_PART; ! .INT — вопросительные частицы (ЧГ-48-49)
	бе	Tag_PART; ! .INT
	ма	Tag_PART; ! .INT
	ме	Tag_PART; ! .INT
	па	Tag_PART; ! .INT
	пе	Tag_PART; ! .INT
	не	Tag_PART; ! .INT ? = rus ‘ли’
	нем	Tag_PART; ! .INT ? = rus ‘ли’
	но	Tag_PART; ! см. TODO 1.6.1
	ноо	Tag_PART; ! уточнить
	оно	Tag_PART; ! = rus ‘вот’
	бин	Tag_PART; ! .INT ? = rus ‘ли’
	бинем	Tag_PART; ! .INT ? = rus ‘ли’
	да	Tag_PART; ! ? = при перечислении + rus ’даже’, ‘хоть [и]’
	та	Tag_PART; ! = да
	ла	Tag_PART; ! ? = rus ‘лишь’, ‘только’
	ле	Tag_PART; ! = ла/ле
	на	Tag_PART; ! = ла/ле
	не	Tag_PART; ! = ла/ле
	дағы	Tag_PART; ! = rus V + -ка (давай-ка)
	тағы	Tag_PART; ! = дағы

LEXICON Tag_PART
	[PART]:0	#;
